test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-khiypp_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩiâpp e-stem verkkokäpy: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Nom: ǩiâpp
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Gen: ǩiâv
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Acc: ǩiâv
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Ill: ǩieʹpˈpe
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Loc: ǩiâvâst
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ǩiâˈvstes
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Com: ǩiâvin
     ǩiâpp+N+Ess: ǩiâppân
     ǩiâpp+N+Par: ǩiâppâd
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Abe: [ǩiâvtaa, ǩiâvtää]
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Nom: ǩiâv
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Gen: ǩiâvi
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Acc: ǩiâvid
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Ill: ǩiâvid
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Loc: ǩiâvin
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Com: ǩiâvivuiʹm
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Abe: [ǩiâvitaa, ǩiâvitää]
     ǩiâpp+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ǩiâvâž
